Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.070

Limits on loans to insiders and affiliates—Exceptions.

(1) A state trust company may not make loans or extensions of credit, nor extend leases, to any person except in relation to nonfiduciary corporate funds and only as set forth in this section.

(2) Unless authorized by subsection (4) of this section, a state trust company may make loans or leases to insiders only to the extent permitted for state banks under federal reserve board regulation O, 12 C.F.R. Part 215.

(3) Unless authorized by subsection (4) of this section, a state trust company may make loans or leases to affiliates as may be reasonably determined by the director by rule. In the absence of rule making to the contrary, the director shall be guided by sections 23a and 23b of the federal reserve act, 12 U.S.C. Secs. 371c and 371c-1, and federal reserve board regulation W, 12 C.F.R. Part 223, governing the permissibility of loans and leases to affiliates by state banks that are members of the federal reserve.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a state trust company may make loans or extensions of credit, or extend leases, in relation to nonfiduciary corporate funds, subject to approval of the director upon written application.

(5) The director may adopt rules interpreting this section and may impose further conditions and restrictions on loans and extensions of credit by state trust companies not inconsistent with this section.

[ 2014 c 37 s 309.]